Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 16. Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund.

§ 32.1-368.
Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and shall be administered by the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of each fiscal year, including interest earned thereon, shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.

The Fund shall consist solely of (i) revenues received by the Commonwealth from voluntary contributions of tax refunds pursuant to the provisions of §

58.1-344.3

that are paid into the state treasury and deposited to the Fund, (ii) specifically designated federal funds, and (iii) any other private grants, donations, gifts, or bequests designated for the Fund.

History.

2009, cc. 26, 521.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 26 and 521, cl. 2 provides: “Moneys deposited in the Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund (the Fund) pursuant to this act shall not be utilized by the Department of Medical Assistance Services until such time as the General Assembly authorizes the Virginia Department of Health and the Virginia Department of Medical Assistance Services to increase access to services under the federal Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000 (BCCPTA), P.L. 106-354, by allowing additional providers who diagnose women with breast cancer or cervical cancer to refer such women to the State Title XV Grantee (Every Woman’s Life Program) for eligibility verification and referral to Medicaid for treatment under the BCCPTA, consistent with ‘Option 3’ of the National Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Detection Program.”

§ 32.1-369.
Uses of Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund.

Moneys deposited to the Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund shall be used to support the treatment of breast and cervical cancer for women under Medicaid pursuant to the federal Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000, P.L. 106-354. Up to 10 percent of the Fund may be used annually to conduct screening activities for breast and cervical cancer under the Every Woman’s Life Program administered by the Virginia Department of Health.

History.

2009, cc. 26, 521.